Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 6.601 TO 6.849 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A legislator or legislative agent shall not intentionally engage in sexual
harassment of any legislator, legislative agent, or employee of the legislative
branch of state government.
(2) Violation of subsection (1) of this section by a legislator or legislative agent is
ethical misconduct.
(3) An employee of the legislative branch of state government aggrieved by a
violation of subsection (1) of this section may notify and seek protection with the
human resources staff of the legislative branch, and may file a claim in
accordance with KRS 344.200.
(4) As used in this section, "sexual harassment":
(a) Means any sexual advance, request for sexual favors, or other verbal or
physical conduct or communication of a sexual nature if:
1. Submission to the advances, requests, conduct, or communication is
an explicit or implicit term or condition of obtaining or retaining
employment;
2. Submission to or the rejection of advances, requests, conduct, or
communication affects decisions concerning a person's employment;
and
3. The conduct or communication has the purpose or the effect of:
a. Unreasonably interfering with the person's ability to perform his
or her job functions;
b. Creating a hostile work environment; or
c. The conduct or communication is sexual harassment as defined
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 203
in:
i. KRS Chapter 344;
ii. Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964;
iii. State or federal case law;
iv. A policy or administrative regulation enforced by the
federal Equal Employment Opportunity Commission; or
v. A policy or administrative regulation enforced by the
Kentucky Commission on Human Rights;
(b) Includes but is not limited to the following conduct or communication:
1. Unwanted sexual contact or conduct of any kind, including sexual
flirtations, touching, advances, actions, propositions, intercourse, or
assault;
2. Unwelcome verbal communication of a sexual nature, including lewd
comments or innuendo, sexual jokes or references, or offensive
references;
3. Demeaning, insulting, intimidating, or sexually suggestive comments
or behavior directed at a person or in the presence of any person in a
public or private setting;
4. The display in the workplace of demeaning, insulting, intimidating, or
sexually suggestive objects, pictures, or photographs;
5. Demeaning, insulting, intimidating, or sexually suggestive written,
recorded, or electronically transmitted messages; or
6. Other conduct or communication not specifically described in the
subsection but that is substantially similar to the conduct or
communication described in this subsection; and
(c) Includes a single incident described in this subsection if it is linked to an
employment benefit or is severe.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:21 AM Jacketed